Washington statutes.
RCW 38.52.550

Emergency communications systems and information—Immunity from civil liability.

A telecommunications company, radio communications service company, or interconnected voice over internet protocol service company, providing emergency communications systems or services or a business or individual providing database information to 911 emergency communications personnel is not liable for civil damages caused by an act or omission of the company, business, or individual, the state, political subdivisions[,] and any 911 public corporations in the:

(1) Good faith release of information not in the public record, including unpublished or unlisted subscriber information to emergency service providers responding to calls placed to an [a] 911 emergency communications service; or

(2) Design, development, installation, maintenance, or provision of consolidated 911 emergency communications systems or services other than an act or omission constituting gross negligence or wanton or willful misconduct.

[ 2022 c 203 s 16; 2010 1st sp.s. c 19 s 20; 2002 c 341 s 5; 1991 c 329 s 7.]

NOTES:

Modernization of statewide 911 emergency communications system—2022 c 203: See note following RCW 38.52.010.

Effective dates—2010 1st sp.s. c 19: See note following RCW 82.14B.010.

Severability—Effective date—2002 c 341: See notes following RCW 38.52.501.